Utah statutes.
46-1-9.   False or incomplete certificate.

A notary may not:

(1)  execute a certificate containing a statement known by the notary to be false or materially incomplete; or

(2)  perform any notarial act with intent to deceive or defraud.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 287, 1998 General Session

